California statutes. Public Resources Code
 than five, the board of directors may, by majority vote of the remaining members of the board, choose not to fill the vacancy. In that event, the total membership of the board of directors shall be reduced by one board member. Upon making the determination not to fill a vacancy, the board of directors shall notify the board of supervisors of its decision.

(d) For the purposes of this section: “consolidation” means consolidation, as defined in Section 56030 of the Government Code; “district” or “special district” means district or special district, as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code; and “reorganization” means reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 172, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5528.

All elections and nominations of candidates for directors subsequent to the first shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general election laws of the State as near as they may be applicable when not in conflict with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5529.

At least 10 days before the date fixed for the district election, notice of the election shall be given by publication once in one or more newspapers of general circulation published and circulated in the district. In districts where no newspaper of general circulation is published, notice shall be posted in three public places for two successive weeks. No other notice of an election need be given. The notice shall refer to the wards as previously established by resolution or ordinance of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5530.

The board of directors shall, in the notice, ordinance, or resolution calling an election, consolidate the district election with the election to be held at the same time in the respective counties in which the district is located and shall authorize the respective boards of supervisors to canvass the returns of the district election and certify the result of the canvass to the directors of the district. The board or boards of supervisors shall so consolidate the election, canvass the returns and cause the result to be properly certified to the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5531.

The election shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election, and only one ticket or ballot shall be used. Nomination papers shall be circulated throughout the ward. A nomination paper containing the name of the candidate to be nominated, with such other information as is required by this article, shall be signed by at least 50 voters residing within the ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 71, Sec. 1.5.   Effective March 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5532.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 5531, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8000) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Elections Code shall substantially govern the manner of appointment of circulators, the form of nomination documents and the securing of signatures to the nomination documents, the filing of the candidate’s nomination documents, the payment of filing fees, and all other things necessary to get the name of the candidate upon the ballot.

(b) Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of any candidate at any time not more than 113 days nor less than 88 days prior to the election, and all nomination documents shall be filed with the secretary of the district not more than 113 days nor less than 88 days before the day of election and shall be examined by him or her.

(c) The election shall be consolidated with the general election as to territory that is the same, and the secretary of the district shall certify the names of all candidates to be placed upon the ballot to the county elections official or officials within the territory affected by the consolidation at least 67 days prior to the date of the election.

(d) Upon the filing of a sufficient nomination paper and declaration of candidacy by any candidate, the name of the candidate shall go upon the ballot at the ensuing general
 election. Upon receipt of the returns of the canvass by the respective boards of supervisors, the directors of the district shall meet and determine results of the election and declare the candidate or candidates elected.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section if, by 5 p.m. on the 83rd day prior to the day fixed for the ensuing general election, only one person has been nominated for any elective office to be filled at that election, or no one has been nominated for the office and if a petition signed by 10 percent of the voters or 50 voters, whichever is the smaller number, in the district, or division if elected by division, requesting that the election of directors be held has not been presented to the board of directors, the board of directors shall submit a certificate of these facts to the county elections official or officials and the board of directors, at a regular or special meeting held prior to the last Monday
 before the last Friday in November in which the election is held, shall appoint to the office or offices the person or persons, if any, who have been nominated. The board of directors shall make the appointments. If no person has been nominated for any office, the board of directors shall appoint any person to the office who is qualified at the first regular or special meeting after the date upon which the election would have been held. The board of directors may permit the candidates running unopposed to have their names appear on the ballot, at the board’s option. The person appointed shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected for the office.

(f) The secretary of the district shall issue certificates of election, signed by him or her and duly authenticated, immediately following the determination of the result of the election or the appointment by the directors of the district.

(g) The oath of office shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district within 30 days after the officer has notice of his or her election or appointment or before the expiration of 15 days before the commencement of his or her term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5533.

Of the directors elected at the next general state election following the election at which the district is created, those three elected by the highest vote in a five-ward district, or those four elected by the highest vote in a seven-ward district, shall hold office for four years, and the other two in a five-ward district and the other three in a seven-ward district for two years, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, at each biennial general election, a number of directors corresponding to the number whose term of office expires shall be elected for terms of four years. The terms shall commence on the first Monday after the first day of January
 next following the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

5533.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5533, with respect to any district formed after December 31, 1974, the board of directors shall at its first meeting determine by lot which three wards in a five-ward district or four wards in a seven-ward district, and which two wards in a five-ward district or three wards in a seven-ward district, shall have four- and two-year terms, respectively, at the next general election. Thereafter, at each biennial general election, a number of directors corresponding to the number whose term of office expires shall be elected for terms of four years. The terms shall commence on the first Monday after the first day of January next following
 the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

5533.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 5533 and 5533.5, with respect to a district formed pursuant to Section 5506.12 where the board of directors of the district is appointed by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located, the terms of office of each member of the board of directors is four years, commencing at noon on the first Monday in January, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Within 30 days after the date a district is formed pursuant to this
 chapter, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is formed shall appoint five persons to the board of directors of the district. Each person appointed by the board of supervisors to serve on the board of directors of the district shall be a registered voter in the district. The persons appointed to the initial board of directors shall hold their first meeting not later than the first Monday that falls after 45 days after the date of formation of the district. At the first meeting of the board, the directors shall classify themselves by lot into two classes of members. The term of office of the first class with three members shall expire at noon on the first Monday in January that is closest to the fourth year after the appointments made pursuant to this subdivision. The term of office of the class with two members shall expire at noon on the first Monday in January that is closest to the second year after the appointments made pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Any vacancy in the office of a member of the board of directors of the district appointed pursuant to this section shall be filled by the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is formed. Any person appointed to fill a vacant office shall fill the balance of the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 24, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5534.

The board of directors may by resolution or ordinance fix the boundaries of the wards or subdistricts for the purpose of electing directors, after the first election creating and establishing the district. The wards shall be established in ample time prior to each biennial general election to permit candidates for the position of directors to circulate nominating papers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5534.5.

Notwithstanding any provision in this article to the contrary, the board may at any time by ordinance alter the existing boundaries of the wards or subdistricts and create new wards or subdistricts for the purpose of increasing the number of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

5535.

The board of directors shall choose one of its members president, and another vice president, who shall act for the president during his absence or disability. The board of directors shall either choose one of its members to serve as secretary and another to serve as treasurer or shall employ one or more administrative secretaries or clerks to perform the duties of secretary or treasurer, or both. The board shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings, which shall be held at least once each month. All legislative sessions of the board, whether regular or special, shall be open to the public. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
 business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.

(a) The board shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(b) The board may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each of its members may receive an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each attendance at a meeting of the board. For purposes of this section, a meeting of the board includes, but is not limited to, closed sessions of the board, board field trips, district public hearings, or meetings of a committee of the board. The maximum compensation allowable to a board member on any given day shall be one hundred dollars ($100). Board members shall not receive
 compensation for more than six meetings of the board in a calendar month, except that board members of the East Bay Regional Park District may receive compensation for not more than 10 days in any one calendar month. A board member may elect to waive the per diem. In addition, the board may provide, by ordinance or resolution, that each of its members not otherwise eligible for an employer-paid or partially employer-paid group medical or group dental plan, or both, may participate in any of those plans available to permanent employees of the district on the same terms available to those district employees or on terms and conditions as the board may determine. A board member who elects to participate in any plan may also elect to have the premium for the plan charged against his or her per diem and may further elect to waive the balance of the per diem.
 Commencing January 1, 2019, if the district compensates its members for more than five meetings in a calendar month, the board shall annually adopt a written policy describing, based on a finding supported by substantial evidence, why more than five meetings per month are necessary for the effective operation of the district.

(c) The board of directors, by ordinance adopted pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20200) of Division 10 of the Water Code, may increase the amount of compensation received for attending meetings of the board.

(d) All vacancies on the board shall be filled in accordance with the requirements of Section 1780 of the Government Code, except that, in the case of vacancies caused by the creation of new wards or subdistricts, the directors shall,
 prior to the vacancies being filled, determine by lot, for the purpose of fixing the terms of the first directors to be elected to the wards or subdistricts, which ward or subdistrict shall have a four-year term and which ward or subdistrict shall have a two-year term. The persons who fill the vacancies caused by the establishment of new wards or subdistricts shall hold office until the next general election and until their successors are elected and qualified for the terms previously determined by lot.

(e) For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 170, Sec. 4.   (AB 2329)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5536.5.

Members of the board of directors may be allowed actual necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred in the performance of official business of the district as approved by the district board. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

5537.

The board of directors is the legislative body of the district and shall determine all questions of policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.

(a) The board shall appoint a general manager, who shall be the chief administrative officer of the district. For appointed roles, the board shall fix their compensation and duties. These appointees shall hold office at the pleasure of the board and shall issue bonds in amounts as the board may require. The board may consolidate appointed offices in one person. The board may also provide for an assistant to any officer of the district, who, when appointed by the board, may perform any act that the assistant’s principal may perform, when authorized to do so by the board.

(b) The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional services required by the district, or
 by the board, or by any officers of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   (AB 769)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.3.

The officers and employees of the County of San Diego may act, ex officio, as officers and employees of the regional district formed pursuant to Section 5506.3 and may discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article. The County of San Diego may provide the services and facilities needed to carry out the functions of the regional district. The proceeds of assessments levied pursuant to Section 5539.3 may be expended to reimburse the county for the actual costs of those services and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1155, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.4.

If a district is created and established in Napa County, the district may contract with Napa County to furnish the services of the officers and employees of the county to discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 74, Sec. 2.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.5.

If the Board of Supervisors of the County of Marin acts as the governing body of a district pursuant to Section 5506.5, the respective officers of that county shall act, ex officio, as officers and employees of the district and discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.7.

If a district is created and established in Riverside County, officers and employees of the County of Riverside may act, ex officio, as officers and employees of the district and may discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 789, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.8.

If a regional district is created and established in San Bernardino County, the regional district may contract with the County of San Bernardino to furnish its officers and employees to discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1017, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.9.

If the regional district is created and established in Los Angeles County, officers and employees of the County of Los Angeles may act, ex officio, as officers and employees of the regional district and may discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article. The County of Los Angeles may provide the services and facilities needed to carry out the functions of the regional district. Proceeds of assessments levied pursuant to Section 5539.9 may be used to reimburse the county for the actual costs of these services and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 823, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5538.10.

The officers and employees of the County of Sacramento may act, ex officio, as officers and employees of the regional district formed pursuant to Section 5506.10 and may discharge the authority and responsibility specified in this article. The County of Sacramento may provide the services and facilities needed to carry out the functions of the regional district. The proceeds of assessments levied pursuant to Section 5539.10 may be expended to reimburse the county for the actual costs of those services and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1071, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.

A district:

(a) Has perpetual succession.

(b) May sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts or tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(c) May adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.3.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the land acquisition, improvements, and services provided by the regional district formed pursuant to Section 5506.3 will specifically benefit the properties assessed and the persons paying the assessments authorized in this section in at least the following respects:

(A) Enhanced recreational opportunities and expanded access to recreational facilities for all residents throughout
 the regional district.

(B) Improved quality of life for all communities in the regional district by protecting, restoring, and improving the regional district’s irreplaceable park, wildlife, open-space, and beach lands.

(C) Preservation of canyons, foothills, and mountains and development of public access to these lands throughout the regional district.

(D) Protection of the diverse historical, cultural, and archaeological values of the territory of the regional district.

(E) Increased economic activity and expanded employment opportunities within the regional district.

(F) Increased property values, resulting from the benefits specified in this subdivision.

(G) Provision of benefits to all properties within the regional district, including positive impacts on air and water quality, capacity of roads, transportation and other public infrastructure systems, schools, and public utilities.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(A) The expansion, restoration, and improvement of park, recreational, beach, and open-space lands throughout the regional district benefits all residents in the regional district.

(B) Protection, restoration, and improvement of the lands within the regional district are vital to the quality of life for all residents in the regional district.

(C) Increased park and recreational opportunities in
 the densely populated and heavily urbanized areas of the regional district are vital to the health and well-being of all residents in the regional district, and providing those opportunities is a high priority.

(D) Portions of parcels of land that are in commercial agricultural use do not benefit from park or open-space lands, facilities, or services funded pursuant to this section.

(b) In addition to the authority conferred in Section 5539.5, to the extent not inconsistent with this section, the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code), is applicable to the regional district, except as follows:

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 22605) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code does not apply.

(2) No changes shall be made pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 22620) of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code or Section 5572 of this code with respect to the rate and method of apportionment of assessments, the use of proceeds of assessments, the use of proceeds of bonds, and the territory included within the district, except that the governing body may correct errors in assessments, rule on appeals of assessments against particular parcels, and annually adjust the assessments levied against particular parcels of real property to reflect changes in the uses of those parcels.

(3) No changes shall be made to the rate and method of apportionment of any assessment approved by the voters and levied pursuant to this section.

(4) In addition to the items required by Section 22567 of the Streets
 and Highways Code, the regional district’s annual report shall include all of the following:

(A) Changes in the total number of parcels assessed and changes in the number of parcels with respect to use code.

(B) The amount of revenue expected to be received by the regional district in the next fiscal year.

(C) The proposed allocation of funds for operation and maintenance for the next fiscal year.

(D) The expenditure of funds in the current fiscal year.

(5) Any notice required pursuant to the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, Section 54954.6 of the Government Code, or Section 5511 shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code.

(6) (A) (i) The governing body shall not levy any assessment unless a proposition authorizing the regional district to levy the assessment is first approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition. The proposition shall include the matters specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5506.3, except for paragraph (6). The election held pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirement for any election that may be required under Section 22525.5 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(ii) No additional assessment shall be levied pursuant to this section, including any assessment for time periods beyond those specified in paragraphs (7) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.3, unless a proposition, including the provisions specified in paragraphs (5), (8), and (9) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.3, is approved by a majority
 of the voters in the regional district voting on the proposition.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of San Diego shall prepare the language in the ballot label. The analysis and review of the measure shall be carried out pursuant to Section 9160 of the Elections Code.

(C) The Board of Supervisors of San Diego County may consolidate a proposition submitted to the voters pursuant to this paragraph into a single ballot measure with the proposition whether to form the regional district submitted pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.3.

(D) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, any assessment proposed pursuant to that act shall be deemed levied upon approval of a majority of the voters voting on the proposition.

(7) (A) All proceeds of assessments levied or bonds issued by the regional district shall be allocated in accordance with paragraphs (5) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.3.

(B) Any future expenditure plan shall include a division of funds between expenditures for capital outlay projects and expenditures for operation and maintenance, a list of proposed capital outlay projects, and a description of areas proposed for acquisition. No expenditure plan shall contain any provision that may impair the payment of debt service on bonds or other evidence of indebtedness previously issued pursuant to this section. Any assessment levied pursuant to this section may include an annual amount to pay the costs of operation and maintenance and may be collected in annual installments.

(c) Prior to the
 election required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), the Board of Supervisors of San Diego County may undertake proceedings on behalf of the proposed regional district in accordance with Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code to create an assessment district with the same boundaries as the proposed regional district. Hearings required pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code may be consolidated with those required pursuant to this article. Those proceedings shall be deemed to be the proceedings required by Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(d) (1) The governing body shall exempt from assessment any uninhabited parcel that is substantially used in agriculture and any parcel enforceably restricted as open-space land during the time that the parcel is so used or
 restricted, if the governing body determines that the parcel will not benefit from the expenditure of the proceeds of assessments.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, lands that are enforceably restricted as open-space lands include, but are not limited to, lands restricted under contract pursuant to the Williamson Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code) and lands restricted pursuant to a conservation easement.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision in the acts specified in Section 5539.5 and in subdivision (b), the net amount to be assessed upon lands within an assessment district may be apportioned by any formula or method that fairly distributes the net amount among all assessable lots or parcels in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each lot or parcel from the improvements.

(f) The regional district shall not levy assessments beyond the last maturity date of any bonds issued pursuant to Section 5539.3, nor longer than 30 years from the date on which the assessment is first levied.

(g) The regional district shall not levy an assessment within a city or within the unincorporated territory of the county if the city or the county has adopted an ordinance limiting rents, and that ordinance applies to real property other than mobilehome parks, unless one of the following applies:

(1) Under the ordinance, the owner of the real property is permitted to increase directly without filing requirements, the rent rate owed by a tenant under an existing lease in an amount not less than that tenant’s proportional share of one-half of the increased assessment applied to the real property.

(2) An amount not less than a tenant’s proportional share of one-half of the increased assessment applied to the real property is added to an annual general adjustment to the rental rate owed by that tenant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.4.

The formation of a district with boundaries coterminous with those of Napa County is not subject to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.5.

For purposes of open space, parkland acquisition, and development, all provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000), Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500), Streets and Highways Code), and the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000), Streets and Highways Code), are applicable to a district. Whenever the public interest or convenience requires, a district may, at the discretion of the board of directors, use any or all provisions of these acts in order to carry out any purpose of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 982, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.7.

(a) In addition to the authority conferred in Section 5539.5, all provisions of the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Division 15 (commencing with Section 22500) of the Streets and Highways Code) are applicable to a district if created and established in Riverside County.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the acts listed in Section 5539.5 and in this section, no assessment shall be levied on real property in the district created and established in Riverside County unless and until it is approved by a majority of the electors of the district. An election called for
 this purpose may be consolidated with the election for the creation and establishment of the district.

(c) The particular amount of the proposed assessment, or a range within which the governing body may fix the amount of the assessment and thereafter revise it during a specified period of time, shall be specified in the measure submitted to the electors pursuant to subdivision (b). In addition, the measure may contain a provision obligating the district, if created and established in Riverside County, to issue to any person paying the assessment an annual pass or coupons entitling that person to the free use, or use on a reduced-fee basis, of district facilities, of a value not to exceed the amount paid by the person as an assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 789, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.8.

(a) In addition to the authority conferred in Section 5539.5, all provisions of the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Division 15 (commencing with Section 22500) of the Streets and Highways Code) are applicable to a regional district if created and established in San Bernardino County. Whenever the public interest or convenience requires, the regional district may, at the discretion of its governing body, use any or all provisions of that act to carry out any purpose of the regional district.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the acts specified in Section 5539.5 and
 in this section, no assessment shall be levied on real property in a regional district created and established in San Bernardino County unless and until it is approved by a majority of the electors of the regional district. An election called for this purpose may be consolidated with the election for the creation and establishment of the regional district.

(c) The particular amount of the proposed assessment, or a range within which the governing body may fix the amount of the assessment and thereafter revise it during a specified period of time, and whether zones shall be established in the regional district for the purpose of having different assessment amounts, shall be specified in the measure submitted to the electors pursuant to subdivision (b). The governing body may exempt from the assessment any uninhabited parcel substantially used in agriculture and any parcel enforceably restricted as open-space land during the time in which the
 parcel is so used or restricted. In addition, the measure shall contain a provision obligating the regional district, if created and established, to issue, upon the request of any person paying the assessment, an annual pass or coupon entitling that person to the free use, or use on a reduced fee basis, of regional district lands and facilities, of a value not to exceed the amount of the assessment that is allocated to regional district facilities and lands and all phases of regional district operations and programs conducted on regional district lands. The pass or coupon shall not apply to special events at regional district facilities or lands and any charges payable to a concessionaire or private person or entity authorized to use regional district facilities or lands.

(d) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the land acquisition, improvements, and services provided by the regional district, if created and established, will
 specially benefit the properties assessed and the persons paying the assessments authorized in this section in at least the following respects:

(1) Enhanced recreational opportunities and expanded access to recreational facilities.

(2) Protection of views, scenery, wildlife, and other resource values enjoyed by residents of the regional district.

(3) Protection of historical and cultural assets of the region.

(4) Increased economic activity and expanded employment opportunities within the regional district.

(5) Reduced costs of local government in areas of law enforcement, fire prevention, natural disaster response, and public health care.

(6) Enhancement of the productivity of some lands and buffering of other lands from incompatible uses.

(7) Increased property values, resulting from the effects specified in this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1017, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5539.9.

(a) In addition to the authority conferred in Section 5539.5, the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code), except Sections 22605, 22609, and 22610 of, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 22620) of Part 2 of Division 15 of, the Streets and Highways Code, is, to the extent not inconsistent with or superseded by this section, applicable to a regional district created and established in Los Angeles County, except as follows:

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 22605) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply.

(2) No changes shall be made pursuant to Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code or Section 5572 of this code with respect to the rate and method of apportionment of assessments, the use of proceeds of assessments, the use of proceeds of bonds, and the territory included within the district, except that the governing body may correct errors in assessments, rule on appeals of assessments against particular parcels, and annually adjust the assessments levied against particular parcels of real property to reflect changes in the uses of those parcels.

(3) No changes shall be made to the rate and method of apportionment of any assessment approved by the voters and
 levied pursuant to this section. 

(4) Article 4 (commencing with Section 22565) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code shall apply to a regional district created pursuant to Section 5506.9, and, in addition to the items listed in that article, the annual report shall include all of the following:

(A) Changes in the total number of parcels assessed and changes in the number of parcels with respect to use code. 

(B) Amount of funds to be generated by the regional district in the next fiscal year. 

(C) The proposed allocation of funds for maintenance and servicing for the next fiscal year. 

(D) The disposition of funds generated by the regional district in the
 current fiscal year. Whenever the public interest or convenience requires, the regional district may, at the discretion of its governing body, use any or all provisions of that act to carry out any purpose of the regional district. 

(b) For the purposes of the regional district, any notice required to be published pursuant to the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 (Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code) or pursuant to Section 5511 shall be published pursuant to Section 6064 of the Government Code. 

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the governing body of the regional district shall not levy any assessment pursuant to the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972 unless a proposition authorizing the regional district to levy the assessments is first approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition. The Board of
 Supervisors of Los Angeles County may consolidate a proposition submitted to the voters pursuant to this subdivision into a single ballot measure with the proposal to determine whether to create and establish a regional district pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.9. Notwithstanding Section 5518, the County Counsel of the County of Los Angeles shall prepare the language in the ballot label. The proposition shall specify the matters set forth in the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5506.9, except paragraph (6) thereof. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, any assessments proposed pursuant to that act shall be deemed levied upon approval of a majority of the voters voting on the proposition.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions in the Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972, all proceeds of assessments levied or bonds issued by
 the regional district shall be allocated in accordance with paragraphs (5) and (8) of subdivision (c) of Section 5506.9. 
